Hawaii statutes.
§431:1-101 Compliance required. No
person shall transact a business of insurance in this State without complying
with the applicable provisions of this code. Any person transacting a business
of insurance under chapter 432 shall be subject to this code only to the extent
provided in chapter 432. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next